North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-03.1 Commitment Procedures
25-03.1-34.2.
Interstate contracts for treatment of mental illness or a substance use disorder.

For purposes of this section, “bordering state” means Minnesota, Montana, or South Dakota.

Unless prohibited by another law and subject to the exceptions in subsection 3, the department may contract with any appropriate treatment or detoxification facility in a bordering state for the treatment of mental illness or substance use disorders or for providing substance use disorder detoxification services for residents of North Dakota. The department may also contract with any public or private agency or facility to provide treatment of mental illness or substance use disorders or to provide substance use disorder detoxification services in North Dakota to residents of a bordering state. An individual who receives treatment for mental illness or a substance use disorder or who receives substance use disorder detoxification services in another state under this section is subject to the laws of the state in which treatment or detoxification is provided. An individual who receives treatment or detoxification in another state under this section must be informed of the consequences of receiving treatment or detoxification in another state, including the implications of the differences in state laws.

A contract may not be entered under this section for treatment or detoxification to individuals who:

Are serving a sentence after conviction of a criminal offense;

Are on probation or parole;

Are the subject of a presentence investigation; or

Have been committed involuntarily in North Dakota under chapter 25-03.1 for treatment of mental illness or a substance use disorder, except as provided under subsection 5.

Contracts entered under this section must, at a minimum:

Describe the services to be provided;

Establish responsibility for the costs of services;

Establish responsibility for the costs of transporting individuals receiving services under this section;

Specify the duration of the contract;

Specify the means of terminating the contract;

Specify the terms and conditions for refusal to admit or retain an individual; and

Identify the goals to be accomplished by the placement of an individual under this section.

The department may enter negotiations with appropriate personnel of a bordering state to develop an agreement that conforms to the requirements of this section. An agreement with a bordering state may enable the placement in North Dakota of individuals who require detoxification services, are on emergency holds, or who have been involuntarily committed as mentally ill or having a substance use disorder in a bordering state and enable the temporary placement in a bordering state of patients who require detoxification services or who are on emergency holds in North Dakota under chapter 25-03.1. An agreement with a bordering state must provide that the North Dakota courts retain jurisdiction over North Dakota residents, and that the bordering state affords to North Dakota residents the rights afforded to the residents under North Dakota law. Individuals committed by a court of a bordering state and placed in North Dakota facilities continue to be in the legal custody of the bordering state. The bordering state’s laws governing length of commitment, re-examinations, and extension of commitment must continue to apply to these residents. In all other respects, residents of a bordering state placed in North Dakota facilities are subject to North Dakota laws. An agreement with a bordering state must specify that responsibility for payment for the cost of care of a resident of a bordering state remains with the bordering state of which that individual is a resident and the cost of care of a North Dakota resident remains with the state of North Dakota. This section applies to detoxification services regardless of whether the services are provided on a voluntary or involuntary basis.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 228, § 1; 2011, ch. 206, § 1; 2019, ch. 225, § 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 224, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-35.
Treatment by an agency of the United States.

If a respondent under this chapter is eligible for treatment by any agency of the United States, the court, upon receipt of notice from that agency showing that facilities are available and that the individual is eligible for care or treatment therein, may order the respondent placed in the custody of the agency for treatment. Any individual admitted under the order of the court to any treatment facility operated by any agency of the United States within or without the state is subject to the rules and regulations of the agency. The chief officer of any treatment facility operated by an agency has the same powers as the heads of treatment facilities within this state with respect to detention, custody, transfer, conditional release, or discharge of patients. Jurisdiction is retained in the committing court of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of an individual so transferred or placed and to determine the necessity for continuance of treatment.

An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia authorizing treatment of an individual by any agency of the United States has the same force and effect as to the individual while in this state as in the geographical jurisdiction of the court entering the order; and the courts of the state or district issuing the order retain jurisdiction of the individual for the purposes of inquiring into the individual’s mental condition and of determining the necessity for continuance of treatment. Consent is hereby given to the application of the law of the state or district in which the court issuing the order for treatment is located with respect to the authority of the chief officer of any treatment facility operated in this state by any agency of the United States to retain custody, transfer, conditionally release, or discharge the individual being treated.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 35; 1993, ch. 279, § 20.

25-03.1-36.
Escape of patient from treatment facility.

If any patient escapes from a treatment facility, the superintendent or director may cause an immediate search to be made. If the patient cannot be found, the superintendent or director shall cause notice of the escape to be given forthwith to the court of the county of residence of the patient and to such health officials or officers of the law as may be of assistance in locating the patient. If the patient is found in the county of residence, the court, at the request of the superintendent or director, shall cause the patient to be returned to the treatment facility and shall issue its order to that effect. The patient must thereupon be transported to the treatment facility as provided in other cases. Should the patient be found other than in the county of the patient’s residence, the patient may be transported at the request of the superintendent to the state hospital as directed and at the expense of the state hospital.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 36.

Collateral References.

Hospital’s liability for patient’s injury or death resulting from escape or attempted escape, 37 A.L.R.4th 200.

25-03.1-37.
Reports to and additional powers of department.

The superintendent or director of a treatment facility, by means of nonidentifying data, shall notify the department of all admissions under this chapter to the state hospital or facility. In addition to the specific authority granted under the provisions of this chapter, the department shall have authority to require nonidentifying statistical data from the head of any hospital relating to the admission, examination, diagnosis, release, or discharge of any mentally ill patient.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 37.

25-03.1-38.
Expenses of district court serving Stutsman County.

All expenses of the district court serving Stutsman County involving patients in residence at the state hospital must be paid by the state hospital under the direction of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 38; 1991, ch. 326, § 74.

25-03.1-39.
Transportation — Expenses.

Whenever an individual is about to be involuntarily hospitalized under the provisions of this chapter, an official or person designated by the court shall arrange for the individual’s transportation to the treatment facility with suitable medical or nursing attendants and by such means as may be suitable for the individual’s medical condition. Whenever practicable, the individual to be hospitalized must be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of the individual’s friends or relatives, and when practicable shall not be transported by police officers or in police vehicles. If the proposed patient is unable to pay for expenses of transportation, and friends or relatives do not oblige themselves to pay such expenses, the court may direct that such expenses be paid by the county of the patient’s residence.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 39.

Cross-References.

Transportation of patients by sheriff, see §§ 11-15-24, 11-15-25.

25-03.1-40.
Rights of patients.

Each patient of a treatment facility retains the following rights, subject only to the limitations and restrictions authorized by section 25-03.1-41. A patient has the right:

To receive appropriate treatment for mental and physical ailments and for the prevention of illness or disability.

To the least restrictive conditions necessary to achieve the purposes of treatment.

To be treated with dignity and respect.

To be free from unnecessary restraint and isolation.

To visitation and telephone communications.

To send and receive sealed mail.

To keep and use personal clothing and possessions.

To regular opportunities for outdoor physical exercise.

To be free to exercise religious faith of choice.

To be free from unnecessary medication.

To exercise all civil rights, including the right of habeas corpus.

Not to be subjected to experimental research without the express and informed written consent of the patient or of the patient’s guardian.

Not to be subjected to psychosurgery or electroconvulsive treatment without the express and informed written consent of the patient or of the patient’s guardian.

In a manner appropriate to the patient’s capabilities, to ongoing participation in the planning of services.

Not to be required to participate in the development of an individual treatment plan.

To be free from aversive reinforcement conditioning.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 40; 1993, ch. 279, § 21; 1995, ch. 268, § 2; 2021, ch. 220, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Cruel treatment a misdemeanor, see § 25-01-16.

Hunting, fishing and trapping without license permitted, see § 20.1-03-04.

Right to counsel, see § 25-03.1-13.

Right to equal care and treatment, see § 25-02-09.

25-03.1-41.
Limitations and restrictions of patient’s rights.

The rights enumerated in subsections 5, 6, 7, and 8 of section 25-03.1-40 may be limited or restricted by the treating physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist trained in a clinical program, if in that individual’s professional judgment to do so would be in the best interests of the patient and the rights are restricted or limited in the manner authorized by the rules adopted pursuant to section 25-03.1-46. When a physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist trained in a clinical program responsible for treatment of a particular patient imposes a special restriction on the rights of the patient as authorized by the rules, a written order specifying the restriction and the reasons for the restriction must be signed by the physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist trained in a clinical program and attached to the patient’s chart. These restrictions must be reviewed at intervals of not more than fourteen days and may be renewed by following the procedure set out in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 41; 1979, ch. 334, § 31; 1993, ch. 279, § 22; 2015, ch. 201, § 17, effective August 1, 2015.

25-03.1-42.
Limitation of liability — Penalty for false petition.

A person acting in good faith upon either actual knowledge or reliable information which makes the petition for involuntary treatment of an individual under this chapter is not subject to civil or criminal liability.

A physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, mental health professional, employee of a treatment facility, state’s attorney, or peace officer who in good faith exercises professional judgment in fulfilling an obligation or discretionary responsibility under this chapter is not subject to civil or criminal liability for acting unless it can be shown that it was done in a negligent manner.

A person that makes a petition for involuntary treatment of an individual without having good cause to believe the individual is a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder and as a result is likely to cause serious harm to self or others is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 42; 1979, ch. 334, § 32; 1989, ch. 149, § 23; 1993, ch. 279, § 23; 2015, ch. 201, § 18, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 223, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-43.
Confidential records.

All information and records obtained in the course of an investigation, an evaluation, an examination, or treatment under this chapter and the presence or past presence of a patient in a treatment facility are confidential, but the information and records may be disclosed to and be used by a court as required to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and as authorized under title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 164. Courts also may release nonclinical identifying information of persons subject to proceedings under this chapter for the purposes of section 62.1-02-01.2. Any information disclosed to a court remains confidential information, except as provided in section 62.1-02-01.2.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 43; 1989, ch. 149, § 24; 1991, ch. 293, § 3; 1991, ch. 592, § 8; 1993, ch. 133, § 2; 1993, ch. 279, § 24; 1995, ch. 271, § 1; 1997, ch. 242, § 1; 2003, ch. 225, § 4; 2011, ch. 502, § 1.

Cross-References.

Supervising department’s access to books and records, see § 25-01.1-06.

25-03.1-44.
Records of disclosure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 225, § 6.

25-03.1-45.
Expungement of records.

Following the discharge of a respondent from a treatment facility or the state hospital or the issuance of a court order denying a petition for commitment, a respondent may at any time move to have all court records pertaining to the proceedings expunged on condition that the respondent file a full release of all claims of whatever nature arising out of the proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 45.

25-03.1-46.
Rules and regulations — Preparation of forms.

The department shall, under chapter 28-32, adopt and enforce such rules as may be necessary for the implementation of this chapter. The supreme court, in consultation with the department, the associations of district judges and state’s attorneys, and other affected organizations, is responsible for the preparation and the department is responsible for distribution of the necessary and appropriate forms to enable compliance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 46; 1989, ch. 149, § 25; 1991, ch. 326, § 75.